Montana, session 2025, LC2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 26, Chapter 501, Laws of 2021, is amended to read:
"Section 26. Termination. [Section 10(3)] terminates June 1, 2023 2027."

Section 2. Section 1, Chapter 259, Laws of 2023, is amended to read:
"Section 1. Section 26, Chapter 501, Laws of 2021, is amended to read:
"Section 26. Termination. [Section 10(3)] terminates June 1, 2023 2025 2027.""

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****